District of Columbia statutes.
9-926

Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

All other general or special laws inconsistent with any provision of this chapter are declared to be inapplicable to the provision of this chapter.

History

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 27, 32 DCR 6093

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1276.